Rhode Island, session 2025, SB362.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 31-10-19 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-10 entitled "Operators’
and Chauffeurs’ Licenses" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-10-19. Driver education — Traffic safety education. [Effective until contingency in
P.L. 2017, ch. 156 and 160 is met.]
(a) The community college of Rhode Island shall provide thirty-three (33) hours of
classroom instruction for applicants or prospective applicants, not more than twenty-one (21) years
of age for a limited instruction permit or license. The instruction shall include eight (8) hours,
specifically for instruction on the effects of alcohol and drugs on a driver, and the instruction shall
be given by a person eligible for a teacher’s certificate issued under the authority of the state board
of regents and which course of instruction shall be approved by the board of governors for higher
education. In case of emergency, the president of the community college of Rhode Island may
declare, when no certified instructor is available to teach, an individual eligible to teach at the
community college of Rhode Island who has taken the required course of instruction in driver
education, may provide driver education instruction. All driver education programs shall include
information concerning the Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act, chapter 18.6.1 of title 23, and
information on donor cards pursuant to the applicable provisions of chapter 18.6.1 of title 23. The
board of governors for higher education shall ensure that each person properly certified and
approved to instruct driver education courses shall be given an equal opportunity for employment

as an instructor within the driver education program. No person teaching driver education under
this section shall own, be employed by, or be associated with a commercial driving school.
(b) Driver education instruction shall be available to any eligible resident applicant not less
than fifteen (15) years and ten (10) months of age.
(c) That the state shall also provide a separate program of instruction, as previously set
forth in this section, for special needs students whose individual education plan (IEP) indicates a
need for a separate program of instruction.
(d) The community college of Rhode Island shall provide a driver training program for
physically handicapped drivers. The program shall instruct the physically handicapped driver in
the operation of adapted vehicles for the handicapped. The adapted vehicles are to be provided by
the handicapped individual. A physically handicapped person must be certified by a licensed
physician that he or she is physically handicapped and possesses sufficient potential to become a
competent motor vehicle operator. The community college of Rhode Island shall establish a tuition
fee sufficient to cover the cost of the program.
(e) A tuition or enrollment fee shall be required to be paid by an eligible applicant in
accordance with rules and regulations of the board of governors for higher education; provided,
that personal checks shall be an acceptable method of payment of the tuition or enrollment fee. The
tuition or enrollment fee shall be deposited in a restricted receipt account established to pay any
and all costs associated with the driver education program at the community college of Rhode
Island and administered by the community college of Rhode Island. Provided further, any person
receiving foster caregiving in foster and adoptive homes as defined in § 42-72.1-2, shall be eligible
for a fee waiver for driver's education classes at the community college of Rhode Island.
(f) The board of governors for higher education is authorized to establish administrative
regulations to further implement this section.
(g) The community college of Rhode Island shall establish tuition fees sufficient to cover
the cost of the program and the administration of the driver education program. All positions
established to implement the driver education program and funded in full by driver education
program fees shall be exempt from the full-time equivalency cap established in Article 1 of the
Appropriations Act, provided, however, that the board of governors shall report by June 1, 2004,
the actual number of filled positions funded exclusively by driver education fees to the chairperson
of the house finance committee, the chairperson of the senate finance committee, and the state
budget officer.
(h) The board of governors for higher education shall provide for an optional and voluntary
course of instruction for the applicant’s parent, guardian, or designee where applicable, on the
LC001586 - Page 2 of 6

content of the driver education curriculum and the requirements for the graduated licensing for
persons under the age of eighteen (18) as contained in § 31-10-6. The community college of Rhode
Island shall be responsible to develop the course of instruction and content for the parent
instruction, or may approve a similar course of instruction, such as AAA’s course, as equivalent to
it, and shall promulgate regulations and establish the appropriate method of providing the
instruction.
(i) Dangers of distracted driving, including, but not limited to, use of cell phones would be
included in this section curriculum and included in all testing as part of the state’s driver’s license
examination.
(j) Included in the classroom instruction shall be curriculum related to the dangers of
marijuana-impaired driving such as the course provided by AAA or similar equivalent.
(k) The curriculum required by subsection (j) of this section shall become effective upon
the effective date of this subsection [June 19, 2023] and shall only be implemented upon the
approval of the course by the state board of education.
31-10-19. Driver education — Traffic safety education. [Effective when contingency
in P.L. 2017, ch. 156 and 160 is met.]
(a) The community college of Rhode Island shall provide thirty-three (33) hours of
classroom instruction for applicants or prospective applicants, not more than twenty-one (21) years
of age, for a limited-instruction permit or license. The instruction shall include eight (8) hours,
specifically for instruction on the effects of alcohol and drugs on a driver, and the instruction shall
be given by a person eligible for a teacher’s certificate issued under the authority of the state board
of education and which course of instruction shall be approved by the state board of education. In
case of emergency, the president of the community college of Rhode Island may declare, when no
certified instructor is available to teach, that an individual eligible to teach at the community college
of Rhode Island, who has taken the required course of instruction in driver education, may provide
driver education instruction. All driver education programs shall include information concerning
the Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act, chapter 18.6.1 of title 23, and information on donor
cards pursuant to the applicable provisions of chapter 18.6.1 of title 23. The state board of education
shall ensure that each person properly certified and approved to instruct driver education courses
shall be given an equal opportunity for employment as an instructor within the driver education
program. No person teaching driver education under this section shall own, be employed by, or be
associated with a commercial driving school.
(b) Driver education instruction shall be available to any eligible resident applicant not less
than fifteen (15) years and ten (10) months of age.
LC001586 - Page 3 of 6

(c) That the state shall also provide a separate program of instruction, as previously set
forth in this section, for special needs students whose individual education plan (IEP) indicates a
need for a separate program of instruction.
(d) The community college of Rhode Island shall provide a driver training program for
physically handicapped drivers. The program shall instruct the physically handicapped driver in
the operation of adapted vehicles for the handicapped. The adapted vehicles are to be provided by
the handicapped individual. A physically handicapped person must be certified by a licensed
physician that he or she is physically handicapped and possesses sufficient potential to become a
competent motor vehicle operator. The community college of Rhode Island shall establish a tuition
fee sufficient to cover the cost of the program.
(e) A tuition or enrollment fee shall be required to be paid by an eligible applicant in
accordance with rules and regulations of the state board of education; provided, that personal
checks shall be an acceptable method of payment of the tuition or enrollment fee. The tuition or
enrollment fee shall be deposited in a restricted receipt account established to pay any and all costs
associated with the driver education program at the community college of Rhode Island and
administered by the community college of Rhode Island. Provided further, any person receiving
foster caregiving in foster and adoptive homes as defined in § 42-72.1-2, shall be eligible for a fee
waiver for driver's education classes at the community college of Rhode Island.
(f) The state board of education is authorized to establish administrative regulations to
further implement this section.
(g) The community college of Rhode Island shall establish tuition fees sufficient to cover
the cost of the program and the administration of the driver education program. All positions
established to implement the driver education program and funded in full by driver education
program fees shall be exempt from the full-time equivalency cap established in Article 1 of the
Appropriations Act, provided, however, that the board of governors shall report by June 1, 2004,
the actual number of filled positions funded exclusively by driver education fees to the chairperson
of the house finance committee, the chairperson of the senate finance committee, and the state
budget officer.
(h) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, the state board of education shall
provide for a required course of instruction for the applicant’s parent, guardian, or designee where
applicable, on the content of the driver education curriculum and the requirements for the graduated
licensing for persons under the age of eighteen (18) as contained in § 31-10-6. The course of
instruction shall be made available in a classroom setting at numerous locations, days, and times
throughout the state, approved by the community college of Rhode Island. All costs and expenses
LC001586 - Page 4 of 6

associated with the course of instruction, including, but not limited to, materials, instructors, and
location fees shall be at the sole expense of the program providers. Once approved by the state
board of education, an online course of instruction shall be made available to parent(s), guardian(s),
or designee(s), where applicable, to meet the requirements of this section. Under no circumstances
shall any parent, guardian, or designee, where applicable, be required to pay any cost or fee in
association with participation in the course required by this section. Upon completion of the course
pursuant to this section, no parent, guardian, or designee shall be required to take the course more
than one time in a five-year (5) period. Parents, guardians, and designees with multiple children
having completed this course shall be deemed to have satisfied this requirement for each child in
their care applying for his or her license during the five-year (5) period. Should AAA or any other
provider cease to provide the course and no other provider exists, the community college of Rhode
Island shall not be required to provide the course of instruction nor shall it be required to pay any
of the costs associated therewith. Parents, guardians, and designees shall not be required to
complete the course prior to their child obtaining a license during any time at which a qualified
program under this section does not exist. The community college of Rhode Island shall be
responsible to develop the course of instruction and content for the parent instruction, or may
approve a similar course of instruction, such as AAA’s course, as equivalent to it, and shall
promulgate regulations and establish the appropriate method of providing the instruction. Should a
qualified program cease to exist for a period of time greater than six (6) months, the course of
instruction will not be required.
(i) Dangers of distracted driving, including, but not limited to, use of cell phones would be
included in this section curriculum and included in all testing as part of the state’s driver’s license
examination.
(j) Included in the classroom instruction shall be curriculum related to the dangers of
marijuana-impaired driving such as the course provided by AAA or similar equivalent.
(k) The curriculum required by subsection (j) of this section shall become effective upon
the effective date of this subsection [June 19, 2023] and shall only be implemented upon the
approval of the course by the state board of education.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001586
========
LC001586 - Page 5 of 6